Utah statutes.
75-2-204.   Decedent's net probate estate.

Unless excluded under Section 75-2-208, the value of the augmented estate includes the value of the decedent's probate estate, reduced by funeral and administration expenses, homestead allowance, family allowances, exempt property, and enforceable claims.

